Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-348
Policies, bonds, or certificates; form; approval.

Except as otherwise provided in Chapter 44 or by the director, no insurance policy, bond, or certificate issued under such policy or bond shall be issued or delivered in this state unless and until a copy of the form has been filed with and approved by the director.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 138, p. 466;

R.S.1913, § 3275;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XI, § 3, p. 648;

C.S.1922, § 7882;

C.S.1929, § 44-1103;

R.S.1943, § 44-348;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 100;

Laws 1991, LB 233, § 44.

An otherwise valid and authorized contract of insurance is not rendered void merely because it has not been approved by the Department of Insurance prior to its issuance. Equity Mut. Ins. Co. v. Allstate Ins. Co., 190 Neb. 515, 209 N.W.2d 592 (1973).

Where endorsement form approved to eliminate coverage of named person is altered by insurer to directly conflict with omnibus clause, it is not valid. Workman v. Great Plains Ins. Co., Inc., 189 Neb. 22, 200 N.W.2d 8 (1972).

Copy of policy form was filed with and approved by department. Peterson v. State Automobile Ins. Assn., 160 Neb. 420, 70 N.W.2d 489 (1955).

Department of Insurance cannot be compelled to approve form of rider which does not state in concise terms the exact coverage or liability prescribed by statute. State ex rel. Republic National Life Ins. Co., v. Smrha, 138 Neb. 484, 293 N.W. 372 (1940).